Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,362
Violations; penalty.

(1) Any person who violates sections 60-6,356 to 60-6,361 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor, except that if such person is convicted of a second or subsequent offense within any period of one year, he or she shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(2) Any violation of such sections which is also a violation under any other provision of Chapter 60 may be punished under the penalty provisions of such chapter.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2808;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 458.